Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.020

Issuance authorized—Purposes—Saving to public body, criteria.

The governing body of any public body may by ordinance provide for the issuance of refunding bonds without an election (1) in order to pay or discharge all or any part of an outstanding series or issue of bonds, including any redemption premiums or interest thereon, in arrears or about to become due, and for which sufficient funds are not available, (2) when necessary or in the best interest of the public body to modify debt service or reserve requirements, sources of payment, covenants, or other terms of the bonds to be refunded, or (3) in order to effect a saving to the public body. To determine whether or not a saving will be effected, consideration shall be given to the interest to fixed maturities of the refunding bonds and the bonds to be refunded, the costs of issuance of the refunding bonds, including any sale discount, the redemption premiums, if any, to be paid, and the known earned income from the investment of the refunding bond proceeds pending redemption of the bonds to be refunded.

[ 1999 c 230 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 262 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 111 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 138 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application—Construction—Severability—1999 c 230: See notes following RCW 39.53.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 111: See note following RCW 39.42.080.